Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB188.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4904(c)(2) and (h) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 4904. Limits on number of towed vehicles.* * *(c) Towing vehicles requiring service.--* * *(2) A combination, including a truck tractor with no more than two trailers, requiring emergency service may be towed to a [nearby garage or other place of safety.] place of repairs of the owner's choosing or other place of safety off of a highway as provided under sections 4923 (relating to length of vehicles) and 4949 (relating to application to tow trucks).12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(h) Certain combinations permitted under section 4968.--Combinations consisting of a truck and one trailer or a truck tractor and one trailer which exceeds the maximum vehicle lengths authorized in section 4923 [(relating to length of vehicles)] and which shall not exceed 102 inches in width, or a truck tractor and no more than two trailers, each trailer of which shall not exceed 102 inches in width and 28 1/2 feet in length may be operated under a permit issued under section 4968 (relating to permit for movement during course of manufacture).* * *Section 2. Section 4923(b.1) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4923. Length of vehicles.* * *(b.1) Combinations.--* * *(10) This subsection shall not apply to a tow truck towing a truck tractor with no more than two trailers requiring emergency service as provided in section 4904(c)(2) (relating to limits on number of towed vehicles).* * *Section 3. Section 4949 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 4949. Application to tow trucks.The weight restrictions set forth in this subchapter do not apply to a combination consisting of any tow truck towing a disabled motor vehicle or truck tractor with no more than two trailers to a place of repairs or other place of safety as long as the overweight combination travels directly to the [first available such location and the movement is performed at the 20250HB0188PN0135 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direction of authorized emergency personnel or a qualified Commonwealth employee.] place of repairs or place of safety.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0188PN0135 - 3 - 123